Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF54.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; MINNESOTA YOUTH COUNCIL.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minnesota Youth Council. new text end new text begin For grants to the Minnesota Alliance With Youth for the activities of the Minnesota Youth Council: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 375,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 375,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end